Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 11 Dividends, Distributions, and Preferred Share Acquisition

Law reviews.

For comment, “A Snapshot of Dual-Class Share Structures in the Twenty-First Century:
A Solution to Reconcile Shareholder Protections with Founder Autonomy,” see 68 Emory L.J. 337 (2018).

7-1-460.
Restrictions on payment of dividends; limitation of actions for dividends or distributions.

The board of directors of a bank or trust company may, from time to time, declare and the bank or trust company thereupon shall pay dividends on its outstanding shares in cash, property, or its own shares, except when the bank or trust company is insolvent or when the payment thereof would render the bank or trust company insolvent or when the declaration or payment thereof would be contrary to any restrictions contained in the articles, and subject to the following provisions:

Dividends may be declared and paid in cash or property only out of the retained earnings of the bank or trust company unless otherwise approved in advance by the department on terms consistent with standards of safety and soundness;

The department may approve the payment of dividends by a bank or trust company, prior to the time such bank or trust company achieves cumulative profitability:

For the purpose of providing the shareholders of a Subchapter S bank with a source of funds to pay federal and state income taxes on the Subchapter S bank’s income that is taxable to those shareholders; or

If a bank or trust company is profitable on an annual basis and the payment of such dividend is consistent with standards of safety and soundness;

Dividends may not be paid without the prior approval of the department in excess of specified amounts as may be fixed by regulations of the department to assure that banks and trust companies maintain an adequate capital structure;

Dividends may be declared and paid in lawfully held treasury shares or in authorized but unissued shares, provided that, in the case of a dividend of authorized but previously unissued shares, there shall be transferred to capital stock an amount equal to the aggregate par value of the shares distributed; and

No dividends payable in shares of any class shall be paid in respect to shares of any other class unless the articles so provide or unless such payment is authorized by the affirmative vote or the written consent of the holders of a majority of the outstanding shares of the class in which the payment is to be made.

A split or division of the issued shares of any class into a greater number of shares of the same class without increasing the capital stock of the bank or trust company shall not be construed to be a share dividend within the meaning of this Code section.

If a bank or trust company has declared a cash dividend on any shares or any other distribution payable in cash or has sold fractional shares or scrip for the account of a shareholder and has mailed to a shareholder, at his address appearing on the records of the bank or trust company, a valid check in the amount of the dividend or other distribution or the proceeds of such sale to which such shareholder is entitled and, if such check would have been honored if duly presented to the bank on which it is drawn, no action for the recovery of such dividend or other distribution or for the amount thereof shall be brought by the shareholder or other person entitled thereto more than seven years after the date of mailing the check.

If a bank or trust company has declared a dividend payable in its own shares or any other distribution payable in its own shares or in other than cash and has mailed to a shareholder, at his address appearing on the records of the bank or trust company, a certificate representing such shares or a notice setting forth the time and manner in which a distribution in other than its own shares or cash shall be paid, no action for the recovery of such dividends or other distribution or for the amount thereof shall be brought by the shareholder or other person entitled thereto more than seven years after the mailing of the share certificate or certificates or, in the case of a distribution in other than the shares of the bank or trust company or in cash, the time specified in the notice for the payment thereof.

When the statute of limitations provided for in this Code section has run with respect to any unclaimed dividend, other unclaimed distribution, or unclaimed proceeds of the sale of fractional shares or scrip, the cash or property represented thereby shall thenceforth be treated as an asset of the bank or trust company.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 19, §§ 29, 30; Code 1933, §§ 13-2029, 13-2030, 13-2031, 13-2032; Code 1933, § 41A-2101, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 86, § 6/HB 141; Ga. L. 2012, p. 795, § 2/HB 945; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 13/HB 185; Ga. L. 2020, p. 320, § 2/HB 781.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “The” for “Dividends may not be declared or paid at any time that the bank or trust company does not have the paid-in capital and appropriated retained earnings required by Code Section 7-1-411, except the” at the beginning of paragraph (a)(2); and deleted “and, after payment of the dividend, the bank or trust company continues to maintain the paid-in capital and appropriated retained earnings required by Code Section 7-1-411” following “shares distributed” near the end of paragraph (a)(4).

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, rewrote paragraph (a)(2), which read: “The department may approve the payment of dividends by a Subchapter S bank, prior to cumulative profitability, for the sole purpose of providing its shareholders with a source of funds to pay federal and state income taxes on the Subchapter S bank’s income that is taxable to those shareholders;”.

7-1-461.
Distribution upon reduction of capital stock or paid-in capital.

Upon the decrease of capital stock of a bank or trust company pursuant to amendment of its articles as provided in this chapter, the board of directors, subject to restrictions of the articles, may distribute to the shareholders of the bank or trust company an amount in cash equal to all or part of the amount of the decrease in capital stock, if immediately after such distribution the bank or trust company would have the capital stock required by this chapter.

Any portion of the amount of a decrease in capital stock which is not distributed to shareholders in accordance with this Code section shall be transferred to paid-in capital.

A bank or trust company, by resolution of its board of directors, may distribute to its shareholders amounts representing a reduction in its paid-in capital, provided that such distribution shall first be approved in writing by the department.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-2102, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 14/HB 185.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, deleted “and would have the paid-in capital and appropriated retained earnings required by Code Section 7-1-411” following “chapter” at the end of subsection (a); and deleted “provided that after such distribution the institution shall continue to have the paid-in capital and appropriated retained earnings required by Code Section 7-1-411 and” following “paid-in capital,” in the middle of subsection (c).

7-1-462.
Dividends and distributions must be authorized by chapter.

The directors of a bank or trust company shall not declare dividends or authorize or ratify the distribution of any part of its assets to shareholders by purchase of its shares or otherwise, except as authorized by this chapter.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-2103, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-463.
Preferred share acquisition.

Unless otherwise provided in its articles, a bank or trust company, by resolution of its board of directors and with the prior approval of the department, may redeem or otherwise acquire preferred shares. In determining whether or not to give its approval under this subsection, the department shall give primary consideration to the question of whether or not, after the cancellation of the preferred shares, the capital accounts of the bank or trust company would be adequate to support its anticipated deposit or trust business.

Preferred shares which are redeemed or otherwise acquired shall be canceled and shall not be reissued without prior approval of the department.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-2104, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 15/HB 185.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, deleted “, if immediately after the redemption or other acquisition the bank or trust company would have the paid-in capital and appropriated retained earnings required by Code Section 7-1-411” following “shares” at the end of the first sentence of subsection (a).